Hawaii statutes.
§103D-1206 Annual inventory reporting by
state officers. The chief procurement officers for their respective
jurisdictions, the administrative heads of the executive departments, and all
other persons, offices, and boards of a public character which are not by law
under the control and direction of any of the officers specifically named in
this section, before September 16 of each year, shall prepare and file with the
administrator of the state procurement office an annual inventory return of
state property in the possession, custody, control, or use of the officer
making the return, or of the department or office of the government over which
the officer presides. Any officer, agent, or employee serving in a department
or under a returning officer shall file an annual inventory return to the
department head or the returning officer. The officer making the return shall
similarly file a copy with the administrator of the state procurement office.
The annual inventory return shall contain the following:

(1) A summary and list by detailed item description
and carrying value of all nonexpendable state property on hand as of July 1 of
the year for which the return is made;

(2) A summary and list by detailed item description
and carrying value of all nonexpendable state property acquired and disposed of
during the year elapsed since the return made as of the preceding July 1; and

(3) A sworn statement certifying the information on
the return, property listings, and carrying values provided with the return to be
full, true, and correct to the best knowledge, information, and belief of the
officer making the return. [L 1994, c 186, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 149, §21]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next